Utah statutes.
54-4-28.   Merger, consolidation, or combination.

No public utility shall combine, merge nor consolidate with another public utility engaged in the same general line of business in this state, without the consent and approval of the Public Service Commission, which shall be granted only after investigation and hearing and finding that such proposed merger, consolidation or combination is in the public interest.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2001 General Session

